Washington statutes.
RCW 43.01.060

Daily remittance of moneys to treasury—Treasurer's duty on default.

The state treasurer shall inform the governor of any failure on the part of any officer to comply with the provisions of RCW 43.01.050.

[ 1965 c 8 s 43.01.060. Prior: 1907 c 96 s 2; RRS s 5502.]